District of Columbia statutes.
7-2047

Prosecutions.

(a)

Prosecutions of violations of this subchapter shall be brought by the Corporation Counsel in the name of the District of Columbia.

(b)

In prosecutions initiated pursuant to this subchapter, a child development facility claiming an exemption from a licensing requirement of this subchapter shall have the burden of proving entitlement to the exemption.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 18, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3637.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.